Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 477.535 is amended to read:
477.535. (1) If the forester determines that any forestland inside or within one-eighth of one  mile
of a forest protection district is  particularly exposed to fire danger, by proclamation the forester
may designate such forestland as an extra fire hazard and may restrict the use of such forestland.
(2) The proclamation shall designate the area to which and the period during which the  re-
strictions apply, and require that the area be subject to use only upon the condition that entrants
comply with all the restrictions for the area.
(3) The proclamation shall designate the type of closure as:
(a) Regulated closure;  or
[(b) Permit closure; or ]
[(c)] (b) Absolute closure.
(4) For the purpose of consistency and coordination between all  affected agencies in the ad-
ministration of forestland restrictions, a plan shall be developed by the forester, in cooperation  with
federal, state and local governmental agencies, landowners and organizations affected by the  re-
strictions. The primary objective  of the plan is uniformity of regulations regardless of land owner-
ship. The plan must recognize variation in fire danger and must specify levels  of closure by unique
but easily recognizable geographic boundaries.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 477.540 is amended to read:
477.540. (1) The forester shall cause  a notice of the closure proclaimed under ORS 477.535 to
be posted in conspicuous locations that are in or near  the designated areas. The forester shall cause
a notice of each proclamation to be published in at least one  newspaper published in each forest
protection district containing the designated areas. Each published notice shall describe the area,
type, restrictions  and effective date of closure[ , and the manner in which permits may be secured if
the area is subject to a permit closure ].
(2) The proclamation shall remain  in force until the time designated therein expires or until the
forester finds that the restricted use is no longer requisite and  by order suspends or terminates it.
A reinstatement of  a closure after a suspension does not require the notices described in subsection
(1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 477.545 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2817 (HB 2817-INTRO) Page 1
477.545. (1) Regulated closures require entrants into designated areas  to comply with the re-
quirements set forth in the proclamation  under ORS 477.535, which requirements in the judgment
of the forester are necessary to prevent danger to life, forest resources or property.
[(2) Permit closures make the area subject to entry  only through permit issued by the forester. The
permit shall contain requirements which in  the judgment of the forester are necessary to prevent danger
to life, forest resources or property. The forester may, during periods of fire hazard  conditions, refuse,
suspend, revoke or restrict such permits. ]
[(3)] (2)  Absolute closures restrict the areas to all forms of use and shall  be designated only
during periods of extreme fire hazard conditions endangering life, forest resources or property.
Passed by House March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2817 (HB 2817-INTRO) Page 2